Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3074.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 19-14.2-8 and 19-14.2-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 19-14.2
entitled "Small Loan Lenders" are hereby amended to read as follows:
19-14.2-8. Maximum loan and interest rate.
Every small loan lender may charge an origination fee the lesser of one hundred dollars
($100) or up to five percent (5%) of the amount borrowed and lend up to five thousand dollars
($5,000) in the aggregate to one borrower and may charge, contract for, and receive on the loan
interest on the unpaid principal balance on a loan at a rate not exceeding the following:
(1) Loans up to and including three hundred dollars ($300), three percent (3%) five percent
(5%) per month plus a monthly service fee up to five dollars ($5.00);
(2) Loans exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) but not exceeding eight hundred dollars
($800), two and one-half percent (2.5%) four and one-half percent (4.5%) per month plus a monthly
service fee up to ten dollars ($10.00); and
(3) Loans exceeding eight hundred dollars ($800), but not exceeding five thousand dollars
($5,000), two percent (2%) four percent (4%) per month plus a monthly service fee up to thirty
dollars ($30.00).
19-14.2-12. Small loans — No other charges — Exception.
In addition to the interest and fees allowed in this chapter, no small loan licensee shall
directly, or indirectly, charge, contract for, or receive any other charges except credit insurance,
lawful filing fees and insurance charges, and other fees listed in § 6-26-2(c) or as authorized by

regulation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006021
========
LC006021 - Page 2 of 3